Utah statutes.
39-6-48.   Cruel and unusual punishments -- Use of irons.

(1)  Punishment by flogging, or by branding, marking, or tattooing on the body, or any other cruel or unusual punishment may not be imposed by any court or inflicted upon any person under this chapter.

(2)  Single or double irons may not be used except when necessary for safe custody.



Enacted by Chapter 210, 1988 General Session

